Massachusetts, session 194th, H4032.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Children and Families shall establish a sick leave bank for Dana Johnson, an
employee of the Department of Children and Families. Any employee of the Department may
voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by
Dana Johnson. If Dana Johnson terminates employment with the Department of Children and
Families or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank
shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for
absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave
bank as determined by the Department.
of 1